lexc/adj/enhuadjmelyige.lexc
LEXICON Possikmely
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Famikmely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Famikmely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Famikmely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Famikmely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Famikmely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE21§   Famikmely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Famikmely;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Famikmely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Famikmely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Famikmely;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE21§k   Famikmely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE22§im   Famikmely;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Famikmely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE22§id   Famikmely;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Famikmely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE22§i   Famikmely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Famikmely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE22§ink   Famikmely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Famikmely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famikmely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famikmely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE22§ik   Famikmely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Famikmely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famikmely;
LEXICON Plurikmely
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genikmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genikmely;
                            Genikmely;

LEXICON Famikmely
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genikmely;
                       Genikmely;

LEXICON Genikmely
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseikmely;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseikmely;
                       Caseikmely;
  
LEXICON Caseikmely
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

Lexicon Tocasejajeae
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmelyjajeae;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammely;


LEXICON Possmelyjajeae
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammely;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammely;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE21§   Fammely;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammely;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammely;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE21§k   Fammely;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE22§im   Fammely;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE22§id   Fammely;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE22§i   Fammely;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE22§ink   Fammely;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammely;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE22§ik   Fammely;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammely;

LEXICON AddAdji
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasei;

Lexicon Tocasei
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmely;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmelyi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammely;


LEXICON Plurmelyi
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmely;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoemely§k    Genmely; 
                            Genmely;

!result
!legeslegkedvesebbet
!legeslegkedvesebben
!legkedvesebbet
!legkedvesebben
!kedvesebbet
!kedvesebben
!kedveset
!kedvesen

LEXICON Adjige
adagolási AddAdji;
adási AddAdji;
ajánlási AddAdji;
akasztási AddAdji;
alakulási AddAdji;
alakítási AddAdji;
alapozási AddAdji;
alkotási AddAdji;
alvási AddAdji;
alázkodási AddAdji;
alázási AddAdji;
birtoklási AddAdji;
bizonytalanodási AddAdji;
bizonyítási AddAdji;
bocsáthatósági AddAdji;
bomlasztási AddAdji;
bontási AddAdji;
bonyolítási AddAdji;
borulási AddAdji;
botlási AddAdji;
bujtási AddAdji;
bukkanási AddAdji;
burjánzási AddAdji;
buzdulási AddAdji;
bánási AddAdji;
bírási AddAdji;
csapolási AddAdji;
csapási AddAdji;
csapódási AddAdji;
csillapulási AddAdji;
csukási AddAdji;
csábítási AddAdji;
csúszási AddAdji;
dagasztási AddAdji;
dalolási AddAdji;
darabolási AddAdji;
dobási AddAdji;
duzzadási AddAdji;
fagyasztási AddAdji;
fagyási AddAdji;
fogatási AddAdji;
fogyasztói AddAdji;
fogási AddAdji;
fokozási AddAdji;
fordulási AddAdji;
formálási AddAdji;
fáradási AddAdji;
fárasztási AddAdji;
fázási AddAdji;
fújási AddAdji;
fúvódási AddAdji;
gondolási AddAdji;
gyilkolási AddAdji;
gyulladási AddAdji;
gyártási AddAdji;
gyóntatói AddAdji;
gyújtási AddAdji;
gázosítási AddAdji;
hajlási AddAdji;
hajtási AddAdji;
halási AddAdji;
hatolási AddAdji;
hatási AddAdji;
hordási AddAdji;
horgászási AddAdji;
horpadási AddAdji;
hunyászkodási AddAdji;
háborodási AddAdji;
hámlási AddAdji;
hódolási AddAdji;
húzási AddAdji;
húzódási AddAdji;
indulási AddAdji;
indíttatási AddAdji;
indítási AddAdji;
irányítási AddAdji;
iszapolódási AddAdji;
járatási AddAdji;
járhatósági AddAdji;
járási AddAdji;
kaparási AddAdji;
kapcsolódási AddAdji;
karmolási AddAdji;
karolási AddAdji;
kompenzálási AddAdji;
kopasztási AddAdji;
kopási AddAdji;
kutatási AddAdji;
lakási AddAdji;
lopási AddAdji;
lyukasztási AddAdji;
látási AddAdji;
maradási AddAdji;
marasztalási AddAdji;
morzsolódási AddAdji;
mozdulási AddAdji;
mozdítási AddAdji;
mállási AddAdji;
mártási AddAdji;
másolási AddAdji;
nyilvánulási AddAdji;
nyomorodási AddAdji;
nyomtatási AddAdji;
nyomási AddAdji;
nyugtatási AddAdji;
nyugvási AddAdji;
oldódási AddAdji;
olvadási AddAdji;
olvasási AddAdji;
oszlatási AddAdji;
osztási AddAdji;
pakolási AddAdji;
pillantási AddAdji;
porzási AddAdji;
puffadási AddAdji;
párlási AddAdji;
párzási AddAdji;
ragasztási AddAdji;
raktározási AddAdji;
rakási AddAdji;
riasztási AddAdji;
robbanási AddAdji;
rogyási AddAdji;
rohadási AddAdji;
roppanási AddAdji;
roskadási AddAdji;
rothadási AddAdji;
rovási AddAdji;
sarjadzási AddAdji;
sarjadási AddAdji;
sorvadási AddAdji;
sorvasztási AddAdji;
sugárzási AddAdji;
szabadulási AddAdji;
szabadítási AddAdji;
szabadításnyi AddAdji;
szaglási AddAdji;
szakítási AddAdji;
szaporodási AddAdji;
szavazási AddAdji;
szilárdulási AddAdji;
szivárgási AddAdji;
szállási AddAdji;
szállásolási AddAdji;
számlálási AddAdji;
számítási AddAdji;
szívási AddAdji;
szólalási AddAdji;
szólamlási AddAdji;
szólási AddAdji;
szórási AddAdji;
szórásnyi AddAdji;
szóródási AddAdji;
sírási AddAdji;
takarítási AddAdji;
tapasztalási AddAdji;
tartozási AddAdji;
tartási AddAdji;
tiltási AddAdji;
toldási AddAdji;
tolási AddAdji;
torlási AddAdji;
tálalási AddAdji;
támadási AddAdji;
tárási AddAdji;
távolodási AddAdji;
utalási AddAdji;
utazási AddAdji;
vakarási AddAdji;
vitatási AddAdji;
vizsgáltatói AddAdji;
vonási AddAdji;
vágási AddAdji;
vágódási AddAdji;
vájási AddAdji;
választási AddAdji;
válogatódási AddAdji;
váltónyi AddAdji;
válási AddAdji;
vándorlási AddAdji;
várási AddAdji;
vásárlási AddAdji;
zajlási AddAdji;
zárkóztatási AddAdji;
zárkózási AddAdji;
zárási AddAdji;
zúzási AddAdji;
áldozási AddAdji;
állítási AddAdji;
állónyi AddAdji;
áramlási AddAdji;
árazási AddAdji;
árusítási AddAdji;
ázási AddAdji;
írási AddAdji;
írásnyi AddAdji;
újhodási AddAdji;
